Massachusetts, session 194th, S663.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (a) of section 35PP of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in the first sentence,
the second time they appear, the words “Salisbury Beach” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- the Salisbury Beach dune and beach system, including public and private
property. All revenues credited under this section shall remain in said Salisbury Beach
Preservation Trust Fund to: acquire sand for the restoration and stabilization of Salisbury Beach
and the protective dune system abutting Salisbury Beach; acquire, install, and maintain dune
stabilization plants and sand fencing; fund the costs of beach nourishment and dune stabilization
and restoration projects in part or in their entirety or by providing local or state matching funds
for coastal resilience projects by other governmental or nongovernmental entities.
of 2

SECTION 2. Said subsection (a) of said section 35PP of said chapter 10 is hereby further
amended by striking out the words “at any point during a fiscal year”.
SECTION 3. Subsection (b) of said section 35PP of said chapter 10 is hereby amended
by striking out the figure “$3” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $4.
SECTION 4. Said subsection (b) of said section 35PP of said chapter 10 is hereby further
amended by inserting after the first sentence the following sentence:- This fee shall be subject to
review by the DCR from time to time, in increments of not less than 3 years, and adjusted to
reflect inflation.
SECTION 5. Said section 35PP of said chapter 10 is hereby further amended by adding
the following 2 subsections:-
(c) DCR shall compile an annual report, which shall include but not be limited to,
projects undertaken, expenditures made, and income received by the fund, detailed, itemized
summaries of executed projects, and visitor traffic data. The report shall be submitted to the
clerks of the senate and house of representatives and to the house and senate committees on ways
and means and posted electronically on the Department of Conservation and Reservation’s
website not later than December 31.
(d) On a biennial basis, DCR shall update the Salisbury Beach State Reservation Barrier
Beach Management Plan, which will include a long-term disaster prevention and recovery plan,
as well as an operational plan for the day-to-day management and maintenance of the beach.
of 2